Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 14
FIRE PROTECTION DISTRICT

Sec.

§ 31-1401. Purpose and policy of law — Short title.

The protection of property against fire and the preservation of life, and enforcement of any of the fire codes and other rules that are adopted by the state fire marshal pursuant to chapter 2, title 41, Idaho Code, are hereby declared to be a public benefit, use and purpose. Any portion of a county not included in any other fire protection district may be organized into a fire protection district under the provisions of this chapter. All taxable property within any fire protection district created under the provisions of this chapter is and shall be benefited ratably in proportion to assessed valuation by the creation and maintenance of such district, and all taxable property within any such district shall be assessed equally in proportion to its assessed valuation for the purpose of and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. This chapter shall be known as the “Fire Protection District Law,” and whenever cited, enumerated, referred to or amended, may be designated as the “Fire Protection District Law,” adding when necessary the code section number.

§ 31-1402. Creation and organization of district.

Whenever twenty-five (25) or more of the holders of title, or evidence of title, to lands aggregating not less than one thousand (1,000) acres of contiguous territory, or consisting of contiguous territory of less extent but having market value for assessment purposes of at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) at the last preceding county assessment, desire to provide for the organization of the same as a fire protection district, none of their lands being included within the boundaries of an already created and organized fire protection district under the terms of this chapter, a district may be created and organized as provided in this chapter.

All creations and organizations of fire protection districts and annexations to existing fire protection districts during the twelve (12) month period preceding the effective date of this act shall be deemed to be in full compliance with all applicable laws regardless of prior interpretations.

§ 31-1403. Petition.

A petition shall first be presented to the board of county commissioners and filed with the clerk of the board of commissioners of each county in which the proposed fire protection district is to be situated, signed by the number of holders of title, or evidence of title specified in section 31-1402, Idaho Code, which petition shall plainly and clearly designate the boundaries of the proposed fire protection district, and shall state the name of the proposed district, and shall be accompanied by a map thereof. The petition, together with all maps and other papers filed therewith shall, at all proper hours, be open to public inspection in the office of said clerk of the board of commissioners between the date of their said filing and the date of the election. The petition may be in one (1) paper or in several papers.

Whenever a petition shall be filed, prior to the publication of notice of hearing pursuant to section 31-1404, Idaho Code, the petitioners shall deposit with the board of county commissioners a sum sufficient to defray the costs of publishing and election as provided by this chapter. In the event a fire protection district is organized, the petitioners shall be reimbursed the amount of their deposit from the first tax moneys collected by the district as provided by this chapter. The amount required to be paid under this subsection shall be determined by the board of county commissioners.

§ 31-1404. Notice of hearing.

When such petition is presented to the board of county commissioners and filed in the office of the clerk of such board, the said board shall set a time for a hearing upon such petition, which time shall not be less than four (4) nor more than six (6) weeks, from the date of the presentation and filing of such petition. A notice of the time of such hearing shall be published by said board, once each week for three (3) successive weeks previous to the time set for such hearing, in a newspaper published within each county in which said district is to be situated. Said notice shall state that a fire protection district is proposed to be organized, giving the proposed boundaries thereof, and that any taxpayer within the proposed boundaries of such proposed district may on the date fixed for such hearing appear and offer any testimony pertaining to the organization of such district, the proposed boundaries thereof or the including or excluding of any real property therein or therefrom. After hearing and considering any and all testimony, if any such be interposed, the county commissioners shall thereupon make an order thereon either denying such petition or granting the same, with or without modification, and shall accordingly fix the boundaries of such proposed district in any order granting such petition. The boundaries so fixed shall be the boundaries of said district after its organization be completed as provided by this chapter, and a map showing the boundaries of such proposed district as finally fixed and determined by the board of county commissioners shall be prepared and filed in the office of the clerk of said board.

If the district is to be situated in two (2) or more counties, each board of county commissioners shall coordinate the hearing date and the publications of notice so that only one (1) hearing need be held. Unless otherwise agreed to by each board of county commissioners involved, the hearing shall be held in the county with the largest area to be included within the district, and the boards of county commissioners are hereby specifically authorized to act in a joint manner for such purposes.

§ 31-1405. Notice of election.

After the county commissioners have made their order finally fixing and determining the boundaries of the proposed district, the clerk of the board of county commissioners shall cause to be published a notice of an election to be held, subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, in such proposed fire protection district for the purpose of determining whether or not the same shall be organized under the provisions of this chapter. Such notice shall plainly and clearly designate the boundaries of such proposed fire protection district, and shall state the name of the proposed district as designated in the petition and shall state that a map showing the boundaries of said district is on file in his office.

Such notice shall be published first not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the election, and a second publication not less than five (5) days prior to such election, in a newspaper published within the county aforesaid. Such notice shall require the electors to cast ballots which shall contain the words “.... fire protection district, yes,” or “.... fire protection district, no” or words equivalent thereto. No person shall be entitled to vote at any election held under the provisions of this chapter unless he shall possess all the qualifications required of electors under the general laws of the state, and be a resident of the proposed district.

If the district is to be situated in two (2) or more counties, the boards of county commissioners shall provide that the election be held on the same day in each county.

§ 31-1406. Election — Qualification of electors — Canvass.

Such election shall be conducted in accordance with title 34, Idaho Code. The board of county commissioners shall establish as many election precincts within such proposed fire protection district as may be necessary, and define the boundaries thereof. The county clerk shall appoint judges of election, who shall perform the duties as judges of election under title 34, Idaho Code; and the result of such election shall be certified, and canvassed and declared by the board of county commissioners.

§ 31-1407. Canvass by board of commissioners — Validity of organization.

Immediately after any election for voting upon the organization of a fire protection district, the judges of said election shall forward the official results of said election to the clerk of said board of commissioners. The said board of commissioners shall meet within ten (10) days after said returns are received and shall proceed to canvass the votes cast at such election, and if, upon canvass, it shall appear that one-half (½) or more of said votes are “. . . . fire protection district, no,” then a record of that fact shall be duly entered upon the minutes of said board, and all proceedings in regard to the organization of said district shall be void. If, however, it shall appear upon such canvass, that more than one-half (½) of the votes cast are “. . . . fire protection district, yes,” the said board shall, by order entered on its minutes, declare such territory duly organized as a fire protection district under the name designated in the petition. After the election, the validity of the proceedings hereunder shall not be affected by any defect in the petition or in the number of qualifications of the signers thereof, and in no event shall any action be commenced or maintained or defense made affecting the validity of such organization after six (6) months from and after the making and entering of the order provided for in this section. Such board shall cause one (1) copy of such order, duly certified, to be filed for record in the office of the county recorder of the county in which said district is situated and shall transmit to the governor one (1) certified copy thereof.

From and after the date of such filing of said order of the board of county commissioners declaring such territory duly organized as a fire protection district, the organization of such district shall be complete.

If the district is to be situated in two (2) or more counties, the boards of county commissioners shall coordinate the canvass of the votes cast and make one (1) joint announcement. If a majority of the votes cast in any county are against the formation of the district, such rejection shall void the organization of the district in all counties.

§ 31-1408. Fire protection board — Appointment of commissioners — Oath.

There shall be three (3) fire protection commissioners in each district, who shall constitute the fire protection board. The first fire protection commissioners of such fire protection district shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners. If the district is to be situated in two (2) or more counties, the boards of county commissioners from those counties shall coordinate a joint public meeting whereby the appointment shall be made by a majority of all county commissioners present at the joint public meeting. If the county commissioners cannot agree on the appointment of a commissioner, all the interested persons who received the highest and equal number of votes shall have their names placed in a container. The county commissioner with the most continuous length of service shall draw one (1) name from the container. The person whose name is drawn shall then be appointed to fill the vacancy. The certificate of such appointment shall be made in triplicate: one (1) certificate shall be filed in the office of the county recorder of the county, one (1) with the clerk of the board of county commissioners, and one (1) with the assessor and tax collector of the county. Every fire protection commissioner and appointed officer shall take and subscribe the official oath, which oath shall be filed in the office of the board of fire protection commissioners. If thirty-three percent (33%) of the area or population in the fire protection district is situated in two (2) or more counties, not more than two (2) of the appointed fire protection district commissioners shall be from the same county.

The oath of office of fire protection commissioners and appointed officers shall be taken before the secretary or the president of the board of the fire protection district at the first regularly scheduled board meeting in January succeeding each election. Provided however, in the event of an inability to appear for the taking of the oath, a duly elected fire protection commissioner may be sworn in and may subscribe to the oath wherever he may be, provided he appear before an officer duly authorized to administer oaths, and provided further that any person who is in any branch of the armed forces of the United States of America may appear before any person qualified to administer oaths as prescribed in section 51-113, Idaho Code, and may take and subscribe the oath of office as provided for in section 59-401, Idaho Code, and the oath of office shall have the same force and effect as though it were taken before the secretary or the president of the fire protection district pursuant to this subsection.

§ 31-1408A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 31-1409. Residence qualifications of commissioners — Term of office — Vacancies.

At the meeting of the board of county commissioners at which the fire protection district is declared organized, as provided by section 31-1407, Idaho Code, the county commissioners shall divide the fire protection district into three (3) subdivisions, as nearly equal in population, area and mileage as practicable, to be known as fire protection commissioners subdistricts one, two and three. Not more than one (1) of the fire protection district commissioners shall be a resident of the same fire protection subdistrict, except that any commissioner appointed by the board of county commissioners under section 31-1408, Idaho Code, shall not be disqualified from the completion of the initial term for which the commissioner was appointed because of the subdistrict in which the commissioner resides. The first commissioners appointed by the board of county commissioners shall serve until the next fire protection district election, at which time their successors shall be elected. The term of office for fire protection commissioners shall commence on the second Monday of January succeeding each general election. Commissioners appointed or elected must be electors residing within the fire protection district for at least one (1) year immediately preceding their appointment or election.

Any fire protection commissioner vacancy occurring, other than by the expiration of the term of office, shall be filled by the fire protection board. If a duly elected or appointed fire protection commissioner resigns, withdraws, becomes disqualified, refuses or, without first providing signed written notice of a temporary vacancy, becomes otherwise unable to perform the duties of office for longer than ninety (90) days, the board, on satisfactory proof of the vacancy, shall declare the office vacant. The board shall fill any vacancies within sixty (60) days of learning of the vacancy. When a vacancy occurs, the board shall direct the secretary to cause a notice of the vacancy to be published in at least one (1) issue of a newspaper of general circulation within the district. The notice shall include the date and time of the meeting when the board will vote to fill the vacancy, and the deadline for qualified elector residents interested in being appointed to the position to submit a written request for appointment to the board. Should the remaining members of the board fail to agree on an individual to fill the vacancy, it shall select the individual by placing the names of all interested persons who received the highest and equal number of votes in a container. The fire commissioner with the most continuous length of service shall draw one (1) name from the container. The person whose name is drawn shall then be appointed to fill the vacancy.

§ 31-1410. Election of commissioners — Resident qualifications of commissioners — Revising subdistricts — Term of office.

On the first Tuesday following the first Monday of November, of the next odd-numbered year, following the organization of a fire protection district, three (3) fire protection district commissioners shall be elected. Not more than one (1) commissioner shall be a resident of the same fire protection commissioner subdistrict. Every odd-numbered year thereafter, an election shall be held for the election of fire protection district commissioners as described in this section. For commissioners whose term in office expires in any even-numbered year, such commissioners shall remain in office until the next election in an odd-numbered year. The county clerk shall have power to make such regulations for the conduct of such election as are consistent with the statutory provisions of chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code.

The board of fire protection district commissioners may revise subdistricts when they deem it necessary due to significant shifts in population. The board of fire protection district commissioners shall revise subdistricts upon any annexation of territory into the district in accordance with sections 31-1410A, 31-1410B and 31-1412(6), Idaho Code, and, in any case, within six (6) months following the end of each decennial United States census reporting year so as to equalize the population, area and mileage between the subdistricts as nearly as practicable. Provided however, of the commissioners comprising the board, not more than one (1) commissioner shall be a resident of the same fire protection commissioners subdistrict. The revision of subdistricts shall not disqualify any elected commissioner from the completion of the term for which he or she has been duly elected. Notice of revised fire protection commissioner subdistricts shall be provided to the county clerk of the county or counties in which the changes occur by means of a resolution that includes a map depicting the revised subdistrict boundaries.

At the first election following organization of a fire protection district, the commissioner from fire protection subdistrict one shall be elected to a term of two (2) years and the commissioners from subdistricts two and three shall be elected to a term of four (4) years; thereafter, the term of office of all commissioners shall be four (4) years. Such elections and all other elections held under this law shall be held in conformity with the general laws of the state including chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code.

A fire protection district whose terms and elections were established by prior law shall convert to the election of commissioners as provided in this section.

In any election for fire protection district commissioner, if after the deadline for filing a declaration of intent as a write-in candidate it appears that only one (1) qualified candidate has been nominated for a subdistrict to be filled, it shall not be necessary for the candidate of that subdistrict to stand for election, and the board of the fire protection district shall declare such candidate elected as commissioner, and the secretary of the district shall immediately make and deliver to such person a certificate of election.

§ 31-1410A. Decision to increase the size of the board.

Subsequent to the creation of a fire protection district and the appointment of the first board of fire protection commissioners, the fire protection board may, by a majority vote of all of the fire protection district board members elect to increase the size of the board to five (5) members.

If the board of fire protection commissioners elects to expand the board to five (5) members, the existing board members shall subdivide the district into five (5) subdivisions as nearly equal in population, area and mileage as practicable to be known as subdistricts one, two, three, four and five.

At the first election following the decision of the board of fire protection commissioners to expand the board from three (3) to five (5) members, five (5) commissioners shall be elected. The commissioners from fire protection subdistricts one and two shall be elected to a term of two (2) years, the commissioners from subdistricts three, four and five shall be elected to a term of four (4) years. Thereafter, the term of all commissioners shall be four (4) years.

A fire district which, prior to the effective date of this section, had elected to expand a board from three (3) to five (5) members shall, prior to the next election of the district, adopt a transition schedule as nearly reflecting the schedule provided in this section as possible[.] For commissioners whose offices expire in 2012 and in any even-numbered year, such commissioners shall remain in office until the next election in an odd-numbered year.

§ 31-1410B. Decision to decrease the size of the board.

Any fire protection board consisting of five (5) members may, by a four-fifths (4/5) majority vote of all of the board members, elect to decrease the size of the board to three (3) members.

If the board of fire protection commissioners elects to reduce the board to three (3) members, the existing board members shall subdivide the district into three (3) subdivisions as nearly equal in population, area and mileage as practicable to be known as subdistricts one, two and three. Notice of revised fire protection commissioner subdistricts shall be provided to the county clerk of the county or counties in which the changes occur by means of a resolution that includes a map depicting the revised subdistrict boundaries.

At the first election following the decision of the board of fire protection commissioners to reduce the board from five (5) to three (3) members, three (3) commissioners shall be elected. The commissioner from fire protection subdistrict one shall be elected to a term of two (2) years and the commissioners from subdistricts two and three shall be elected to a term of four (4) years. Thereafter, the term of all commissioners shall be four (4) years.

For commissioners whose office expires in any even-numbered year, such commissioners shall remain in office until the next election in an odd-numbered year.

§ 31-1411. Annexation of territory in same county — Petition — Hearing — Order — Certification to county commissioners — Alternate procedure — Election — Petition to de annex property from existing district and annex into another district.

After the organization of a fire protection district, additional contiguous or noncontiguous territory lying within the same county may be added thereto and shall thereupon and thenceforth be included in such district. Territory that is not contained in an existing fire district, and is not immediately adjoining the boundaries of the fire district into which annexation is sought, may be annexed into the district provided the territory consists of not less than forty (40) contiguous acres. At least seventy-five percent (75%) or more of the owners or contract purchasers of the land sought to be annexed shall petition the fire protection board and request annexation of the territory particularly described in said petition. Upon receipt of any such petition the fire protection board shall hold a hearing not less than ten (10) nor more than thirty (30) days thereafter, or upon the written consent of the petitioner within one hundred eighty (180) days, and said board shall cause notice of such hearing, designating the time and place, to be published in at least one (1) issue of a newspaper of general circulation within the district. Any person supporting or objecting to such petition shall be heard at such hearing, if in attendance, and at the close of such hearing said board shall approve or reject said petition. If the board approves said petition it shall make an order to that effect and certify a copy of said order containing an accurate legal description of the annexed territory to the board of county commissioners of the county where said fire district is situated. Said board of county commissioners shall thereupon enter an order of annexation and cause the same to be recorded so as to include the annexed property on the tax rolls as in this chapter provided.

In the event that more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the owners or contract purchasers of the land sought to be annexed do not join in said petition, and the board determines by resolution entered on the minutes of the board, that the annexation would be in the best interests of the district and that an election on the issue should be held, additional territory may nevertheless be annexed by the affirmative vote of a majority of the qualified electors of such additional territory voting on the question at an election held therefor, which vote may be taken at an election held as provided in section 31-1405, Idaho Code. The same procedure shall be adopted as provided in sections 31-1402 through 31-1406, Idaho Code.

§ 31-1411A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 31-1411B. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 31-1412. Annexation of territory in adjoining county.

After the organization of a fire protection district, additional territory, contiguous or noncontiguous thereto and located wholly within an adjoining county, may be added to the district and become a part thereof as hereinafter provided in this section. Noncontiguous territory annexed to an existing fire protection district shall consist of not less than forty (40) contiguous acres. The proceedings for annexation shall be the same as the proceedings for the creation and organization of a fire protection district with the following exceptions and modifications:

Such proceeding may be initiated by:

Two (2) or more of the holders of title or evidence of title to lands aggregating not less than one hundred (100) acres; or

One hundred percent (100%) of the holders of title or evidence of title to lands aggregating not less than one hundred (100) acres.

A petition, such as is required by section 31-1403, Idaho Code, shall be filed with the fire protection board of the fire protection district into which petitioners seek to be annexed. The petition shall accurately describe the boundaries of the territory and name and describe the fire protection district to which annexation is sought. The petition shall be accompanied by a map showing and distinguishing the boundaries of the original district and the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed, and showing the location of the intervening county line. An election is not required pursuant to subsection (5) of this section when the petition includes a certification as to the following: (a) that one hundred percent (100%) of the holders of title or evidence of title of the property proposed to be annexed have joined in the initial petition requesting annexation; and (b) that there is no electorate present in the property proposed to be annexed. The fire protection board shall follow the notice and public hearing requirements contained in section 31-1411, Idaho Code, and if it approves of the annexation proposal, it will issue a written resolution consenting to the proposed annexation. If the fire protection board issues such a resolution, the petitioners shall proceed in accordance with the steps outlined in this section.

A petition, such as is required by section 31-1403, Idaho Code, shall be filed with the board of county commissioners of the county in which is situated the territory proposed to be annexed but shall accurately describe the boundaries of the territory, and name and describe the fire protection district to which annexation is sought, shall be accompanied by a map showing and distinguishing the boundaries of the original district and the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed, and showing the location of the intervening county line. An election is not required pursuant to subsection (5) of this section when the petition includes a certification as to the following: (a) that one hundred percent (100%) of the holders of title or evidence of title of the property proposed to be annexed have joined in the initial petition requesting annexation; and (b) that there is no electorate present in the property proposed to be annexed. The petition must be accompanied by a certified copy of the resolution of the board of fire protection commissioners consenting to the annexation.

The notice of hearing on the petition shall state that certain territory described in the petition, is proposed to be annexed to a fire protection district named in the petition and that any taxpayer within the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed may offer objections at the time and place specified. The order entered by the local board of county commissioners on the petition shall, if the petition be granted, fix the boundaries of the annexed territory and direct that a map of it be prepared under the direction of the clerk of the board, and certified copies of the order and map shall be transmitted to the clerk of the board of county commissioners of the county in which the original fire protection district is situated.
(5) An election shall be conducted by the county clerk or elections office in the county where the land sought to be annexed is situated, subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, in the territory proposed to be annexed for the purpose of voting upon the annexation and the notice shall accurately describe the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed, shall state the name of the district to which annexation is sought, and that a map showing the boundaries of the district and of the territory proposed to be annexed is on file in the office of the clerk of the local board of county commissioners. The notice shall prescribe the form of ballot to be cast, which shall contain the words “In favor of annexation to .... Fire Protection District” and “Against annexation to .... Fire Protection District,” and shall direct that the voter indicate his choice thereon by a cross (X). An election pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall accomplish no purpose and, therefore, shall not be required if the following conditions are certified in the petition(s) submitted in accordance with subsections (2) and (3) of this section: (a) that one hundred percent (100%) of the holders of title or evidence of title of the property proposed to be annexed have joined in the initial petition requesting annexation; and (b) that there is no electorate present in the property sought to be annexed.

§ 31-1413. Consolidation of districts — Hearing — Protest — Election.

Except as provided for in section 31-1423(2)(b), Idaho Code, any fire protection district may consolidate with one (1) or more existing fire protection districts subject to the following procedure, or pursuant to an election for consolidation as provided in section 31-1414, Idaho Code, and with the following effects:

If, in the opinion of the board of any fire protection district, it would be to the advantage of said district to consolidate with one (1) or more other existing fire protection districts, the said board shall cause to be prepared an agreement for consolidation which shall among other things provide:

The name of the proposed consolidated fire protection district.

That all property of the districts to be consolidated shall become the property of the consolidated district.

That all debts of the districts to be consolidated shall become the debts of the consolidated district.

That the existing commissioners of the districts to be consolidated shall be the commissioners of the consolidated district until the next election, said election to be held pursuant to the terms of section 31-1410, Idaho Code, at which three (3) commissioners shall be elected, unless the agreement of consolidation establishes a five (5) member board, in which case five (5) commissioners shall be elected. If the board consists of three (3) members, commissioners from fire protection subdistricts one and two shall be elected for terms of four (4) years, and the commissioner from fire protection subdistrict three shall be elected for a term of two (2) years. If the board consists of five (5) commissioners, the commissioners from fire protection subdistricts one, three and five shall be elected for terms of four (4) years, and the commissioners from fire protection subdistricts two and four shall be elected for an initial term of two (2) years. Thereafter, the term of all commissioners shall be four (4) years.

That the employees of the consolidated fire protection district shall be selected from the employees of the fire protection districts being consolidated, which employees shall retain the seniority rights under their existing employment contracts.

After approval of the agreement of consolidation by each of the fire protection district boards involved, the boards of commissioners of each fire protection district shall hold a hearing not less than ten (10) or more than thirty (30) days thereafter and shall cause notice of the hearing, designating the time and place to be published in at least one (1) issue of a newspaper of general circulation within the district not less than five (5) days prior to the hearing. Any person supporting or objecting to the petition shall be heard at the hearing, if in attendance, and at the close of the hearing the board shall approve or reject the agreement of consolidation. If each board approves the agreement of consolidation, the agreement shall become effective and the consolidation of the district complete thirty (30) days after the approval unless within the thirty (30) days a petition signed by twenty-five percent (25%) of the qualified electors of one (1) of the fire protection districts objecting to the consolidation be filed with the secretary of the district. In the event of an objection, an election shall be held as provided in section 31-1405, Idaho Code, except that the question shall be “consolidation of .... fire protection district, yes,” or “consolidation of .... fire protection district, no,” or words equivalent thereto. If more than one-half (½) of the votes cast are yes, the agreement shall become effective. If more than one-half (½) of the votes cast are no, the agreement shall be void and of no effect; and no new consolidation shall be proposed for at least six (6) months following the date of the consolidation election.

Upon the agreement of consolidation becoming effective, the board of the consolidated fire protection district shall file a certified copy of the agreement with the county recorder of each county in which such district is situated and shall comply with the provisions of section 63-215, Idaho Code. The consolidated district shall thereafter have the same rights and obligations as any other fire protection district organized under the statutes of this state.

An agreement of consolidation shall not take effect unless the provisions of section 31-1423(2)(b), Idaho Code, are complied with.

§ 31-1414. Election for the consolidation of districts.

Any two (2) or more fire districts may, in the discretion of the fire district commissioners, or shall, upon a petition signed by ten percent (10%) or more of the electors in the last general election residing in each of the fire protection districts proposed for consolidation, conduct an election in the manner provided in section 31-1405, Idaho Code, at which the following question shall be submitted to the electorate: “Shall . . . . . fire protection districts be consolidated?” or words equivalent thereto. At least one (1) public hearing shall be held by the boards of fire district commissioners prior to the election. If a majority of the votes cast in each district proposed for consolidation are in favor of consolidation, the districts shall be deemed consolidated and an agreement of consolidation in conformity with the provisions of section 31-1413, Idaho Code, shall be entered into by the fire protection district boards involved, except that an agreement of consolidation entered into pursuant to an election as provided in this section shall not thereafter be subject to an election upon objection as provided in subsection (2) of section 31-1413, Idaho Code.

If two (2) districts are proposed for consolidation and less than a majority of the votes cast in any one (1) of the districts are in favor of the consolidation, the consolidation shall not become effective. If more than two (2) districts are proposed for consolidation, the consolidation may proceed with respect to those districts in which a majority of the votes cast are in favor of the consolidation.

§ 31-1415. Organization of board — Meetings — Officers — Official bonds.

Immediately after qualifying, the board of fire protection commissioners shall meet and organize as a board, and at that time, and whenever thereafter vacancies in the respective offices may occur, they shall elect a president from their number, and shall appoint a secretary and treasurer who may also be from their number, all of whom shall hold office during the pleasure of the board, or for terms fixed by the board. The offices of secretary and treasurer may be filled by the same person. Certified copies of all such appointments, under the hand of each of the commissioners, shall be forthwith filed with the clerk of the board of county commissioners and with the tax collector of the county.

As soon as practicable after the organization of the first board of fire protection commissioners, and thereafter when deemed expedient or necessary, such board shall designate a day and hour on which regular meetings shall be held and a place for the holding thereof, which shall be within the district. Regular meetings shall be held at least quarterly. The minutes of all meetings must show what bills are submitted, considered, allowed or rejected. The secretary shall make a list of all bills presented, showing to whom payable, for what service or material, when and where used, amount claimed, allowed or disallowed. Such list shall be acted on by the board. All meetings of the board must be public, and a majority shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. All fire protection districts shall meet the financial audit filing requirements as provided in section 67-450B, Idaho Code. All meetings of fire protection boards shall be noticed and run in accordance with the open meeting law provided for in chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code, inclusive. All records of fire protection districts shall be available to the public in accordance with the provisions of public records law as provided for in chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

The officers of the district shall take and file with the secretary, an oath for faithful performance of the duties of the respective offices. The treasurer shall on his appointment execute and file with the secretary an official bond in compliance with section 41-2604, Idaho Code, in such an amount as may be fixed by the fire protection board but in no case less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

§ 31-1416. Fire protection districts are governmental subdivisions of idaho and bodies politic and corporate.

Every fire protection district upon being organized as provided by this chapter shall be a governmental subdivision of the state of Idaho and a body politic and corporate, and as such has the power specified in this chapter. Its powers can be exercised only by the fire protection board or by agents and officers acting under their authority, or authority of law. The name of the district designated in the order of the board of county commissioners declaring the territory duly organized as a fire protection district, shall be the corporate name of such district, and it must be known and designated thereby in all actions and proceedings touching its corporate right, property and duties.

§ 31-1416A. [Amended and Redesignated.]